Vermont, session 2025-2026, H720.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The business of cloud computing is one of relatively recent origin,
its growth has been rapid, and it is already of great importance to the residents
and the economic vitality of Vermont.
(2) For both private and public entities, on-demand internet access to a
shared pool of compute resources—such as networks, servers, storage,
analytics, databases, and software—with pay-as-you go pricing, can generate
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 2 of 18
significant cost savings and improve an entity’s scalability, operational
efficiency, and resource management.
(3) Individual consumers, also, may benefit from cost savings as well as
the increased accessibility, mobility, reliability, and security that is generally
available through cloud computing.
(4) The accelerated commercial growth of cloud computing and its
commensurate importance to the general welfare of the State underscores that
this service has become affected with a public interest and, therefore, should be
subject to the jurisdiction and supervision of the Public Utility Commission
and the Department of Public Service.
(5) As cloud migration increases, it is imperative that the State ensure
that the market remains free of anticompetitive and unfair or deceptive
business practices, such as vendor lock-in, excessive data egress or termination
fees, opaque and complex pricing, and insufficient data privacy and security
safeguards.
(6) By enforcing targeted regulatory requirements and monitoring the
cloud service market, generally, the Public Utility Commission and the
Department of Public Service are well positioned to ensure that cloud
computing service is offered fairly and reliably in Vermont and in a manner
that serves the public good.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 3 of 18
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. chapter 15 is added to read:
CHAPTER 15. CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICE
§ 621. TITLE
This chapter may be cited as the “Cloud Computing Public Utility Act.”
§ 622. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a regulatory environment for
cloud computing service that promotes innovation, competition, and economic
efficiencies and simultaneously protects the residents and the general welfare
of Vermont.
§ 623. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Cloud computing” has the same meaning as in National Institute of
Standards and Technology (NIST) Special Publication 800-145, or any
successor document published by NIST, and comprises five essential
characteristics; four deployment models; and three service models, Software as
a Service, Platform as a Service, and Infrastructure as a Service, as described
therein. However, with respect to deployment models, this chapter only
applies to a public cloud or to a hybrid cloud but only to the extent it comprises
distinct public cloud infrastructure.
(2) “Cloud computing service” or “cloud service” means a mass-market
retail service in Vermont that provides cloud computing where the consumer
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 4 of 18
does not manage or control the underlying cloud infrastructure, including
network, servers, operating systems, or storage. The term does not include:
(A) data-storage service offered on a stand-alone basis; or
(B) a software as a service (SaaS) offering where an application is
made available to a consumer through cloud infrastructure and where access to
cloud computing is incidental to the SaaS offering.
(3) “Cloud service provider” means a company or that part of a
company that provides cloud computing service that exceeds, specific to
Vermont, either a gross operating revenue threshold or a consumer-count
threshold established by the Public Utility Commission. The Commission
shall establish these thresholds by rule or, after notice and hearing, by order.
(4) “Commission” means the Public Utility Commission.
(5) “Company” means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship,
limited liability company, association, or any other incorporated or
unincorporated legal entity engaged in the business of providing cloud
computing service to the general public in this State.
(6) “Consumer” means a person to whom a cloud service provider sells
cloud computing service.
(7) “Department” means the Department of Public Service.
(8) “Person” has the same meaning as in 1 V.S.A. § 128.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 5 of 18
§ 624. JURISDICTION
(a) The Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service
shall have jurisdiction over cloud service providers in this State, including their
directors, receivers, trustees, lessees, or other persons owning or operating the
companies, and all plants and equipment used in or about the business carried
on by them in this State as covered and included in this chapter. This
jurisdiction shall be exercised by the Commission and the Department so far as
may be necessary to enable them to perform the duties and exercise the powers
conferred upon them by law.
(b) In addition to the provisions of this chapter, a cloud service provider
shall have the privileges provided in and be subject to the requirements of
chapters 1 and 7 of this title in the same manner as other public service
companies subject to the supervision of the Commission and the Department
unless such privileges and requirements are inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter, in which case the provisions of this chapter shall control.
§ 625. CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC GOOD
A cloud service provider seeking to own or operate a cloud service business
in this State shall first petition the Commission to determine whether the
operation of such business will promote the general good of the State pursuant
to the procedures and requirements established in section 231 of this title and
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 6 of 18
shall be subject to the supervision of the Commission and the Department as
provided in that section and in this chapter.
§ 626. SERVICE QUALITY
A cloud service provider shall furnish and maintain reasonably adequate,
efficient, just, reasonable, and reliable cloud service to the public.
§ 627. NONDISCRIMINATION; PROHIBITED PRACTICES
(a) A cloud service provider shall provide cloud service upon reasonable
request, and without unjust discrimination. A provider shall not furnish service
or charge rates in a manner that gives undue or unreasonable preference or
advantage to any person or class of persons or, conversely, gives undue or
unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage to any person or class of persons.
(b) The Commission may prescribe by rule or order specific conduct or
business practices that constitute unjust discrimination under this section and
may further prescribe measures for preventing such conduct or practices.
Unjust business practices include unreasonably denying, blocking, or
degrading lawful service to any person or class of persons.
§ 628. RATE SCHEDULE; TERMS OF SERVICE; FILING
(a) Within a time and in a form and manner prescribed by order of the
Commission, a cloud service provider shall file with the Commission and the
Department a rate schedule. The rate schedule shall include the rates, fees, and
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 7 of 18
charges applicable to the provider’s existing cloud service offerings and shall
also include the terms of service relating to its service.
(b) A rate schedule shall be just and reasonable. A rate schedule is
presumed to be just and reasonable in a competitive market. The Department
shall investigate the justness and reasonableness of a rate schedule and any
subsequent changes to a rate schedule or terms of service. Upon
recommendation of the Department, or on its own motion and after notice and
hearing, the Commission may modify a rate schedule or any terms of service it
finds are unjust, unreasonable, or unfairly discriminatory.
(c)(1) The cloud service market in this State is presumed to be competitive
unless the Commission determines, after notice and hearing, that a
noncompetitive market exists. A determination that a noncompetitive market
exists shall be based on the Commission’s assessment that the existing
regulatory requirements are not sufficient to ensure that cloud service rate
schedules and terms of service are just and reasonable and are not unjustly or
unreasonably discriminatory. When assessing market conditions for purposes
of this section, the Commission shall consider such factors as market
dominance, inefficiencies caused by market power, barriers to market entry,
service differentiation, burdens on data portability, and any other factor
deemed relevant by the Commission.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 8 of 18
(2) If the Commission determines a noncompetitive market exists under
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission shall adopt by rule
standards and requirements necessary to protect the consuming public and the
general welfare of the State, including more stringent rate regulations and other
measures designed to protect consumers and the free flow of commerce.
§ 629. AFFORDABILITY; BASELINE SERVICE
The Public Utility Commission may establish and periodically review
baseline cloud computing service offerings for specified customer classes and
may cap the maximum rates for such offerings, subject to hardship exemptions
for small providers. When considering and reviewing potential customer
classes as authorized by this section, the Commission shall take into
consideration the needs of small businesses, public entities, nonprofit
organizations, and low-income consumers.
§ 630. TRANSPARENCY; CONSUMER DISCLOSURES
(a) Upon the request of a consumer or prospective consumer, a cloud
service provider shall promptly disclose in written form the rate, fees, charges,
and terms of service applicable to the consumer or prospective consumer based
on stated resource usage and other pertinent information. The disclosure form
required by this section shall also include the provider’s resource-management
practices, performance characteristics, and any other commercial terms
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 9 of 18
sufficient to enable a consumer or prospective consumer to make informed
choices about cloud service options.
(b) After establishing service with a consumer, a provider may increase a
fee or add a new fee only after providing notice to the consumer. The
increased or new fee shall be effective not sooner than 60 days after the notice
is mailed to the consumer and provided such effective date does not conflict
with the expiration date of an existing fee.
§ 631. CONSUMER DATA PORTABILITY
(a) Upon the request of a consumer, a cloud service provider shall provide
configuration, meta data, images, and other workload artifacts in a portable,
commonly used, and readily usable format that allows the consumer to
transmit such data to another cloud service provider without hindrance, subject
to security and integrity safeguards. A cloud service provider shall not charge
an excessive fee for the provision of this data to a consumer.
(b) A cloud service provider shall not charge or collect from a consumer a
service termination fee.
§ 632. OPEN ACCESS TO FACILITIES
(a) For the purpose of fostering a competitive market, a cloud service
provider shall allow and enable access to its plant and equipment in Vermont
for the installation, interconnection, and maintenance of another provider’s
cloud infrastructure. The company providing such access shall develop a
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 10 of 18
statement of the generally available rates, terms, and conditions applicable to
such installations. A copy of this statement shall be filed with the Public
Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service in a form and
manner prescribed by the Commission.
(b) The Commission, upon petition of the Department or upon its own
motion, may investigate the rates, terms, and conditions in effect for a provider
and may alter or change the rates, terms, or conditions if, after notice and
hearing, the Commission determines such rates, terms, or conditions are not
just and reasonable or are unfairly discriminatory.
(c) The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. For the
purpose of promoting competition and open access, the rules shall specify that
exclusive contracts or provisions thereof that are solely intended to inhibit
other providers from accessing facilities are in violation of this section. Access
to facilities shall not be permitted if such access would impair a provider’s
ability to render adequate service to its consumers or ensure the privacy and
security of consumer data.
(d) The Commission shall have authority to arbitrate disputes between or
among providers or prospective providers that arise pursuant to this section and
shall prescribe by rule or order standards and procedures for efficient dispute
resolution.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 11 of 18
§ 633. REGULATORY FEES
For the purpose of contributing to the maintenance of the Public Utility
Commission and the Department of Public Service, beginning on or before
April 15, 2028, and annually thereafter, a cloud service provider shall be
subject to section 22 of this title and, accordingly, shall pay into the State
Treasury taxes on the provider’s gross operating revenue from its regulated
cloud service business in this State. The tax rate or rates required by this
section shall be established by legislative enactment of the General Assembly,
upon consideration of recommendations received by the Public Utility
Commission and the Department of Public Service, respectively.
§ 634. PROVIDER REPORT
Upon request of the Public Utility Commission and in a form and manner
prescribed by the Commission, a cloud service provider shall submit periodic
reports to the Commission and the Department of Public Service. These
reports shall include information sufficient for the Commission to monitor
cloud service availability, resource-management practices, portability
performance, quality of service, rates and fees, and a summary of consumer
complaints filed in the immediately preceding 12 months and a description of
how those complaints were resolved.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 12 of 18
§ 635. COMMISSION NEEDS ASSESSMENT
(a) Beginning on or before January 15, 2028, and every three years
thereafter, the Commission shall submit a needs assessment to the House
Committees on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and on Environment and the
Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy. This
needs assessment shall include findings and recommendations concerning
Vermont’s cloud service needs, including with respect to the subjects itemized
in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The needs assessment required by this section shall include:
(1) current and projected demand for cloud computing service by
Vermont businesses, institutions, governmental entities, and residents;
(2) an evaluation of existing in-State and regional data center capacity
and cloud service provider options;
(3) identification of cloud infrastructure gaps that may limit economic
development, innovation, or essential services;
(4) an analysis of the relationship between energy and water demand
and cloud infrastructure deployment, including data center energy and water
consumption patterns;
(5) an assessment of long-term energy and water needs based on current
and projected computing needs;
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 13 of 18
(6) strategies for ensuring reliable, affordable, and secure access to
compute resources for all Vermont residents;
(7) the environmental impact of data centers and cloud infrastructure
and the applicability of energy efficiency and renewable energy standards; and
(8) any other matters deemed relevant by the Commission.
(c) In preparing the needs assessment required by this section, the
Commission shall hold at least one public hearing and shall seek input from the
public and relevant stakeholders, including:
(1) cloud computing service providers operating in Vermont;
(2) representatives of small businesses and startups requiring cloud
service;
(3) representatives of educational institutions and health care
organizations relying on cloud service;
(4) data center operators and developers; and
(5) cybersecurity and digital infrastructure experts.
§ 636. CONFIDENTIALITY
The Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service shall
maintain the confidentiality of any information received under this chapter that
they determine is exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public
Records Act or other applicable law, unless disclosure is ordered by a court.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 14 of 18
§ 637. RULES AND ORDERS
(a) In addition to the rules and orders otherwise required by this chapter,
the Commission may adopt any other rules or issue any other orders the
Commission deems necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter,
including:
(1) minimum service reliability and uptime standards;
(2) data security, privacy, and backup requirements;
(3) service-level agreement standards and consumer protection
requirements;
(4) interoperability and data portability requirements;
(5) disaster recovery and business continuity requirements;
(6) consumer notification procedures for service changes, outages, or
security incidents;
(7) billing and pricing transparency and accuracy standards;
(8) procedures concerning consumer complaints and efficient dispute
resolution;
(9) technical specifications for data center facilities serving Vermont
consumers; and
(10) environmental and energy efficiency standards for cloud
infrastructure.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 15 of 18
(b)(1) The Commission may revise any rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter by order of the Commission without the revisions being subject to the
rulemaking requirements of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, provided the Commission:
(A) provides notice of any proposed changes;
(B) allows for a 30-day comment period:
(C) responds to all comments received on any proposed changes;
(D) provides a notice of language assistance services on all public
outreach materials; and
(E) arranges for language assistance to be provided to members of
the public as requested using professional language services companies.
(2) Any order issued under subsection (1) of this subsection shall be
subject to appeal to the Vermont Supreme Court under section 12 of this title,
and the Commission must immediately file any orders, a redline, and clean
version of the revised rules with the Secretary of State, with notice
simultaneously provided to the House Committee on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure and the Senate Committee on Finance.
§ 638. PENALTIES; COMPLIANCE AFFIDAVIT
(a) A cloud service provider who violates a provision of this chapter or any
other provision of this title or rule adopted or order issued pursuant to any such
provisions shall be subject to the penalties specified in section 30 of this title.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 16 of 18
(b) At any time, the Commission may require a cloud service provider to
file a compliance affidavit or affirmation as provided in subsection 30(g) of
this title.
§ 639. EFFECT ON OTHER LAWS
This chapter shall not limit other statutory rights of a consumer or statutory
obligations of a cloud service provider under Vermont law.
§ 640. STATUTORY CONSTRUCTION; SEVERABILITY
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this
chapter are liberally construed to accomplish its purpose.
(b) As provided in 1 V.S.A. § 215, the provisions of this chapter are
severable. If any provision of this chapter is invalid, or if any application
thereof to any person or circumstance is invalid, the invalidity shall not affect
other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application.
§ 641. STATE AUTHORITY
The General Assembly enacts this chapter pursuant to all inherent State
authority under the 10th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and to all
relevant authority granted and reserved to the states by Title 15 of the U.S.
Code, including the authority to impose requirements necessary to protect
public safety and welfare and safeguard the rights of consumers.
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 17 of 18
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 2 is amended to read:
§ 2. DEPARTMENT POWERS
(a) The Department of Public Service shall supervise and direct the
execution of all laws relating to public service corporations and firms and
individuals engaged in such business, including the:
(1) formation, organization, ownership, and acquisition of facilities of
public service corporations under chapter 3 of this title;
* * *
(11) supervision and regulation of the organization and operation of
municipal plants under chapter 79 of this title; and
(12) supervision and regulation of the organization and operation of
electric cooperatives under chapter 81 of this title; and
(13) supervision and regulation of the organization and operation of
cloud service providers under chapter 15 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 4. 30 V.S.A. § 30(a)(2) is amended to read:
(2) A person who violates a provision of chapter 3 or, 5, or 15 of this
title, except for the provisions of section 231 or 248 of this title, shall be
required to pay a civil penalty after notice and opportunity for hearing. If the
Commission determines that the violation substantially harmed or might have
substantially harmed the public health, safety, or welfare; the interests of utility
VT LEG #385138 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.720
2026 Page 18 of 18
customers; the environment; the reliability of utility service; or the financial
stability of the company, the Commission may impose a civil penalty as
provided in subsection (b) of this section. If the Commission determines that
the violation did not cause or was not likely to cause such harm, the
Commission may impose a civil penalty of not more than $42,500.00, in
addition to any financial benefit to the violator resulting from the violation.
Sec. 5. APPLICATION
Sec. 2 of this act (enacting 30 V.S.A. chapter 15) shall apply to all cloud
service providers doing business in Vermont on or after July 1, 2027.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385138 v.2